Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 17 Professional Standard Review Organizations

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Tort liability of medical society or professional association for failure to discipline or investigate negligent or otherwise incompetent medical practitioner, 72 ALR4th 1148.

§ 35-17-101.
Definition.

As used in this act [§§

35-17-101

through

35-17-105

]:

“Professional standard review organizations” means:

Any medical, dental, optometric, nursing, osteopathic, emergency medical or pharmacy organization or a local, county, or state medical, dental, optometric, nursing, osteopathic and pharmacy society and any such society itself when such organization or society is performing any medical, dental, nursing, optometric, osteopathic, emergency medical and pharmacy review function or involving any controversy or dispute between a physician, dentist, optometrist, nurse, osteopath, emergency medical technician and pharmacist and a patient concerning the diagnosis, treatment, or care of such patient or the fees or charges therefor, or a physician, dentist, optometrist, nurse, osteopath, emergency medical technician or pharmacist and a provider of medical, dental, optometric, nursing, osteopathic, emergency medical and pharmacy benefits concerning any medical, dental, nursing, optometric, osteopathic, emergency medical, pharmacy or other health charges or fees of such physician, dentist, optometrist, nurse, osteopath, emergency medical technician or pharmacist;

A committee of a medical staff in a hospital having the responsibility of evaluation and improvement of the quality of care rendered in the hospital;

A committee functioning to review, pursuant to federal or state laws, the operation of hospital or extensive care facilities; or

A committee having the responsibility of evaluation and improvement of the quality of care rendered in a long-term care facility.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 185, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-528; Laws 1981, ch. 107, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2011, ch. 138, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

added “or” at the end of (a)(i)(C); and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2011 amendment,

in (a)(i)(A), added “emergency medical” and “emergency medical technician” throughout.

Laws 2011, ch. 138, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Applied

in

Nalder v. West Park Hosp., 254 F.3d 1168, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 12399 (10th Cir. 2001).

Cited

in

Setliff v. Memorial Hosp., 850 F.2d 1384,

1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 9231

(10th Cir. 1988); Harston v. Campbell County Mem. Hosp., 913 P.2d 870,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 35-17-102.
Authority to establish professional standard review organizations.

Any local, county or state medical, dental, nursing, optometric, osteopathic, emergency medical or pharmacy society in Wyoming is hereby authorized to establish a professional standard review organization as defined in W.S.

35-17-101

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 185, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-529; 2011, ch. 138, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

added “emergency medical.”

Laws 2011, ch. 138, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

§ 35-17-103.
Exemption from liability; exception.

Any professional standard review organization or a society or person rendering services as a member of a professional standard review organization functioning pursuant to this act [§§

35-17-101

through

35-17-105

] is not liable either independently or jointly for any civil damages as a result of acts or omissions in his capacity as a member of any such organization or society. Such persons or organizations or societies are not immune from liability for intentional or malicious acts or omissions resulting in harm or any grossly negligent acts or omissions resulting in harm.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 185, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-530.

§ 35-17-104.
Exemption from liability for witnesses.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person providing information to any professional standard review organization shall be held, by reason of having provided such information, to have violated any criminal law, or to be civilly liable under any law unless:

The information is unrelated to the performance of the duties and functions of the professional standard review organization; or

The information is false and the person providing the information knew or had reason to know that the information was false.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 107, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-17-105.
Information of review organizations to be confidential and privileged.

All reports, findings, proceedings and data of the professional standard review organizations is confidential and privileged, and is not subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action, and no person who is in attendance at a meeting of the organization shall be permitted or required to testify in any civil action as to any evidence or other matters produced or presented during the proceedings of the organization or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions or other actions of the organization or any members thereof. However, information, documents or other records otherwise available from original sources are not to be construed as immune from discovery or use in any civil action merely because they were presented during proceedings of the organization, nor should any person who testifies before the organization or who is a member of the organization be prevented from testifying as to matters within his knowledge, but that witness cannot be asked about his testimony before the organization or opinions formed by him as a result of proceedings of the organization.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 107, § 1.

Material found to be confidential and privileged. —

Notes taken by a nurse manager at a meeting pertaining to the birth of a child on the day he was born were confidential and privileged under the statute where the nurse manager: (1) was member of the defendant hospital's OB/Peds committee, which reviewed nursing care as well as medical care and the policies and procedures which the OB department worked under, (2) reported to the hospital quality assurance committee, and (3) made recommendations for the handling of patient care issues. Nalder v. W. Park Hosp., 254 F.3d 1168, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 12399 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2001).

Materials reviewed by committee not privileged. —

This section cannot be construed to preclude a plaintiff's access to all information which is relevant to a doctor's accreditation, in a cause of action against a hospital for negligence in the accreditation and maintenance of qualified medical personnel. The privilege protects from discovery the records concerning the internal proceedings of the hospital committee, but does not exempt from discovery materials which the committee reviews in the course of carrying out its function, nor action which may be taken thereafter by the hospital as may be influenced by the committee decision. In short, privileged data does not include the materials reviewed by the committee, only those documents produced by the committee as notes, reports and findings in the review process. Greenwood v. Wierdsma, 741 P.2d 1079,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1987), limited, Adams v. Walton, 2011 WY 58, 248 P.3d 1167,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2011) (decided under former § 35-2-602).

Trial court should conduct in camera review. —

The trial court has an obligation to weigh the interest of the party seeking discovery of information from medical records against the patient's privacy interest; the materials which are sought should be submitted to the trial court so it can determine whether the interest in access of a party to the materials reviewed outweighs the privacy interest of the patient to whom those records may relate. Harston v. Campbell County Mem. Hosp., 913 P.2d 870,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1996), reh'g denied,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. Apr. 23, 1996).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “An Obstacle Course to Court: A First Look at Wyoming's Medical Review Panel Act,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 489 (1987).

§ 35-17-106.
Election to be covered by federal immunity.

The state of Wyoming elects to be immediately covered by the immunity granted by the Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986, P.L. 99-660, Title IV adopted by Congress in 1986, to the extent authorized, as of the effective date of this section for all health care professional review bodies as defined in the act, for the applicable division of the department of health in its duties under W.S.

33-36-101

through

33-36-115

related to emergency medical services and for:

The board of dental examiners, W.S.

33-15-101

through

33-15-131

;

The state board of nursing, W.S.

33-21-120

through

33-21-156

;

The state board of examiners in optometry, W.S.

33-23-101

through

33-23-116

;

The state board of pharmacy, W.S.

33-24-101

through

33-24-151

;

The state board of medicine, W.S.

33-26-201

through

33-26-203

;

The board of registration in podiatry, W.S.

33-9-101

through

33-9-113

;

The board of chiropractic examiners, W.S.

33-10-101

through

33-10-117

; and

The Wyoming workers’ compensation medical commission and any health care provider providing peer reviews or independent medical evaluations, reviews or opinions, W.S.

27-14-101

through

27-14-806

.

Boards named in subsection (a) of this section shall comply with the physician reporting requirements as set forth in P.L. 99-660, Title IV.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 193, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 2003, ch. 116, § 2; 2011, ch. 138, § 1; 2012, ch. 48, § 1; ch. 98, § 1; 2021 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2011 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), added “for the applicable division of the department of health in its duties under W.S.

33-36-101

through

33-36-115

related to emergency medical services.”

Laws 2011, ch. 138, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2012 amendments.—

The first 2012 amendment, by ch. 48, § 1, effective July 1, 2012, added (a)(viii).

The second 2012 amendment, by ch. 98, § 1, made stylistic changes in (a)(vi) and (a)(vii).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "33-23-116" for "33-23-117" in (a)(iii).

Federal law. —

The Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986, P.L. 99-660, Title IV, is codified as 42 U.S.C.S. § 11101 et seq.